Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 27. Diesel Fuel Tax
§ 3023.
Review of Commissioner’s decision.

Any aggrieved licensed user or taxpayer may have any decision, order, or finding of the Commissioner made under this chapter reviewed under Rule 75 of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure. Such review shall be to the Washington Superior Court or, in the discretion of the appellant, to the Superior Court in the county where the licensed person has his or her principal place of business or residence. The hearing on the review shall be de novo.

The appeal provided by this section shall be the exclusive remedy available to any licensed user or taxpayer for review of a decision of the Commissioner.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1985, No. 58

, § 6.

§ 3024.
Penalties.

Any person under this chapter who shall willfully: fail or refuse to pay the tax imposed or engage in any activity for which a license is required without having procured and maintained such license; fail to make any of the reports required; make any false statement in any application, report, or statement required; refuse to permit the Commissioner or any deputy to make the examination as provided by subsection 3013(c) of this title; fail to keep proper records of quantities of fuel received, sold, used, or delivered in this State as required; make any false statement on any delivery ticket or invoice as to the quantity of fuel delivered, sold, or used; make any false statement in connection with a report or an application for the refund of any monies or taxes; or engage in any act or activity with the intent to evade payment to or prevent collection by the State of the tax imposed shall be, in addition to any other prescribed penalties, guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $5,000.00 or imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.

It shall be unlawful for any person:

to operate a motor vehicle subject to the provisions of this chapter upon any public highway in the State without first obtaining the diesel fuel user’s license and marker required under section 3007 of this title or to so operate without displaying the marker or to so operate without having in the vehicle the license issued under section 3007 or a permit issued under section 3010 of this title;

to violate any regulation issued by the Commissioner pursuant to the authority granted hereunder; or

to operate a motor truck without maintaining the record required by section 3025 of this title.

Any person who violates any provision of subsection (b) of this section shall be fined not more than $2,000.00 or not less than $500.00. Such penalty shall be in addition to the penalty imposed by any other section of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1983, No. 44

, § 10, eff. April 21, 1983;

1985, No. 58

, § 7;

2015, No. 47

, § 45;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 225.

§ 3025.
Records required.

The user of a motor truck with a gross weight or registered weight of 26,001 pounds or more shall maintain a daily record of total miles traveled and miles traveled within the State.

Such records shall be retained by the user for a period of not less than four years and shall be available for inspection by the Commissioner or designated agents or enforcement officers.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1983, No. 44

, § 5, eff. April 21, 1983;

1999, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 226.

§ 3026.
Reports by railroads.

Every person or corporation operating a railroad in the State shall file by mail a report with the Commissioner on forms prescribed by him or her, which shall include the number of gallons of fuel used in Vermont by railroad trains owned or operated by them on a quarterly basis on or before October 31 for the calendar quarter ending September 30, on or before January 31 for the calendar quarter ending December 31, on or before April 30 for the calendar quarter ending March 31, and on or before July 31 for the calendar quarter ending June 30.

Each report required under this section shall be accompanied by a remittance payable to the Agency of Transportation for an amount computed by multiplying the number of gallons of fuel indicated on the report at the rate per gallon for railroad fuel indicated in section 3003 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1987, No. 241

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2019, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. July 13, 2020.

§ 3027.
Civil penalty.

In addition to any other penalty imposed for violation of this chapter, a civil penalty of $1,000.00 shall be imposed upon a purchaser or user for each instance in which the purchaser or user uses untaxed fuel to propel a motor vehicle upon the highways of the State.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1999, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 227.

§ 3028.
Bulk sales; transferee liability.

Whenever a licensee (transferor) required to collect and remit the tax required by this chapter shall make any sale, transfer, lease, or assignment (transfer) in bulk of any part or the whole of the assets of a business, otherwise than in the ordinary course of the business, the purchaser, transferee, lessee, or assignee (transferee) shall, at least 10 days before taking possession of the subject of the transfer or before payment therefor if earlier, notify the Commissioner in writing by mail of the proposed transfer and of the price and date thereof; and whether or not the transferor has represented to, or has informed the transferee that the transferor owes any tax, interest, or penalties required by this chapter and whether or not the transferee has knowledge that such taxes, interest, or penalties are owed, and whether any taxes, interest, or penalties are in fact owed.

Whenever the transferee shall fail to give notice to the Commissioner as required by subsection (a) of this section, or whenever the Commissioner shall inform the transferee that a possible claim for tax, interest, or penalty exists, any sums of money, property, or choses in action, or other consideration, that the transferee is required to transfer over to or for the transferor shall be subject to a first priority right and lien for any taxes, interest, or penalty theretofore or thereafter determined to be due from the transferor to the State, and the transferee is forbidden to transfer the consideration to or for the transferor to the extent of the amount of the State’s claim.

For failure to comply with this section, the transferee shall be personally liable to the State for the amount of the State’s claim theretofore or thereafter determined to be due to the State from the transferor and the liability may be assessed and enforced against the transferee in the same manner as provided for by this chapter against the transferor.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 36; amended

2019, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. July 13, 2020.

§ 3029.
Personal liability.

Any licensee who fails to collect the tax required by this chapter or to pay it to the Commissioner in the manner required by this chapter shall be personally and individually liable for the amount of such tax and any interest and penalty assessed thereon pursuant to sections 3017 and 3018 of this title; and if the licensee is a corporation or other entity, the personal liability shall extend and be applicable to any officer or agent of the corporation or entity who as an officer or agent of the same is under a duty to collect the tax and pay it to the Commissioner as required in this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 37.

§ 3030.
Tax liability as property lien; discharge and foreclosure.

If any licensee required to pay the tax under this chapter neglects or refuses to pay the same after demand is made by the Commissioner, the amount, together with all penalties and interest provided for in this chapter and together with any additional costs that may accrue, shall be a lien in favor of the State upon all property and rights to property, whether real or personal, belonging to such licensee. Such lien shall arise at the time demand is made by the Commissioner and shall continue until the liability for such sum with interest and costs is satisfied or becomes unenforceable. Such lien shall have the same force and effect as the lien provided for in

32 V.S.A. § 5895

, and notice of such lien shall be recorded as provided for in

32 V.S.A. § 5895

.

Release and foreclosure of the lien shall be as provided in

32 V.S.A. § 5895(b)

and (c).

This section shall also apply to any officer or agent found personally liable pursuant to section 3029 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 38; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 228.

§ 3031.
Lien fees.

Notwithstanding

32 V.S.A. § 502

, the Commissioner may charge against any collection of liability any related lien filing fees specified in

32 V.S.A. § 1671(a)(6)

or § 1671(c) paid by the Commissioner. Fees collected under this section shall be credited to a special fund established and managed pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5, and shall be available as payment for the fees of the clerk of the municipality.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 40.